California statutes. Water Code
(1) A statement describing the activity, failure to act, flood system improvement, or encroachment that constitutes a violation of this article, including the sections of this part or board regulations that are being violated.

(2) A statement of whether the activity, flood system improvement, or encroachment may be eligible for a permit from the board.

(3) The corrective actions that shall be taken within a specified time period.

(4) Whether the person or public agency may correct the violation without obtaining prior approval from the board or executive officer, or whether prior
 approval from the board or executive officer must be obtained prior to taking a corrective action.

(5) A statement that the notice of violation shall be referred to the board and that the failure to take the requested actions within the time specified may subject the person or public agency to a cease and desist order and the imposition of further remedial and enforcement actions, including, but not limited to, correction of the violation by the board at the person’s or public agency’s expense and penalties.

(6) The name, address, and telephone number of the state or issuing agency that may be contacted for further information.

(d) The notice of violation shall be served in accordance with Section 8703 and a copy transmitted to the executive officer within five calendar days of its issuance. The board or the
 executive officer may amend the notice of violation, and, once served in accordance with Section 8703, the amended notice of violation shall supersede any notice of violation previously issued for the same violation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.2.

(a) If the board or executive officer determines that any person or public agency has failed to adequately respond to a notice of violation, the board or executive officer may issue an order directing that the person or public agency to whom the notice of violation was issued to cease and desist.

(b) The board or executive officer may, within its discretion, issue a cease and desist order without first issuing a notice of violation in cases where the board or executive officer finds that issuance of a notice of violation would be futile, would result in unreasonable delay, or would be unlikely to invoke a timely response. In the event the board or executive officer issues a cease and desist order
 without first issuing a notice of violation, the cease and desist order shall contain the information required under subdivision (c) of Section 8701.

(c) A cease and desist order shall do all of the following:

(1) Include a copy of the notice of violation.

(2) Be effective upon its issuance and served immediately pursuant to Section 8703.

(3) Require that the corrective actions described in the notice of violation be completed within a specified time period or the person or public agency shall be subject to an enforcement order pursuant to Section 8701.4.

(4) Provide a date, time, and location of a public meeting before the board at which the person or public agency may appear to contest
 the cease and desist order.

(d) The meeting noticed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) shall be consistent with all of the following:

(1) The meeting shall be scheduled to occur at least 30 days after issuance of the cease and desist order and shall be held pursuant to the provisions of this part and regulations adopted by the board.

(2) At the meeting, the board may affirm, amend, modify, stay, or rescind the cease and desist order.

(3) If a person or public agency subject to a cease and desist order fails to appear at the meeting, the cease and desist order may be approved by default.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.4.

(a) If the board or executive officer determines that any person or public agency has failed to correct a violation as outlined in a cease and desist order, the board shall hold an enforcement hearing to consider the issuance of an enforcement order.

(b) The enforcement hearing shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Notice of the hearing, issued pursuant to Section 8703, shall be provided at least 30 days before the hearing is scheduled to occur, unless it is determined that the public interest necessitates a shorter notice period.

(2) Notice of the hearing shall
 include a proposed enforcement order, including any proposed administrative penalties.

(3) The hearing shall be held pursuant to the provisions of this part and regulations adopted by the board.

(4) If the person or public agency subject to the cease and desist order fails to appear at the hearing, the right to a hearing will be deemed waived.

(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may approve, amend, or reject the proposed enforcement order and thereby take any and all of the following actions:

(1) Order the removal, modification, or abatement of the encroachment, flood system improvement, or activity causing a violation of this part.

(2) Order the restoration of the site.

(3) Impose and require the payment of administrative penalties as set forth in Section 8704.

(4) Order the recording of the enforcement order with the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property associated with the violation is located.

(5) Initiate a civil action in the name of the state for mandamus, injunction, civil penalties, or other appropriate remedy authorized by law.

(6) Order any other actions or conditions as the board may determine are necessary to resolve the violation and ensure compliance with this part.

(d) The enforcement order shall state any necessary findings and shall be served immediately pursuant to Section 8703.

(e) A person or public agency against which the board has issued an enforcement order may seek judicial review of the enforcement order pursuant to Section 8579. The enforcement order shall be deemed effective upon issuance.

(f) If the board orders removal, modification, abatement, or restoration pursuant to this part, the board, its contractor, or its designee may conduct the work, the costs of which shall be collected from the responsible person or public agency by whatever legal remedy is available, including, but not limited to, the placement of a lien on the property owned by the person or public agency responsible for the violation pursuant to Section 8704.2. Removal, modification, abatement, or restoration actions shall not be taken by the board until after the time for judicial review has passed.

(g) If the
 board orders the enforcement order to be recorded with the office of the county recorder, the executive officer shall issue a certificate of abatement to the person or public agency against whose property the enforcement order was recorded when the enforcement action has been fully resolved, including the payment of any costs and penalties. The person or public agency may, at the owner’s expense, record the certificate with the office of the county recorder.

(h) This section does not authorize the issuance of an enforcement order as to any lawful activity undertaken by a public agency pursuant to Section 8708.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

(a) The board, following notice and opportunity for a hearing, may order the removal or modification of an encroachment that was previously issued a permit by the board if the board makes one of the following findings based on substantial evidence:

(1) The encroachment presents an imminent threat to the structural integrity of the levee, channel, flood control work, or other facility of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(2) The encroachment significantly impairs the functional capability of the levee, channel, flood control work, or other facility of the State Plan of Flood Control to fulfill its particular intended role in the overall
 flood control plan.

(3) The encroachment is not in conformance with state law, board regulations, or, in the case of facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control, the standards and regulations of the Secretary of the Army.

(b) Routine maintenance by the board, the executive officer, the department, or local agencies that operate and maintain facilities and works on behalf of the board that includes the removal or modification of abandoned property, fences, gates, and vegetation on a levee or other flood control structure shall not be subject to this section.

(c) The removal or modification of previously permitted encroachments shall not be subject to administrative or civil penalties pursuant to Section 8704 or 8704.1.

(d) If the board orders the
 removal or modification of a previously permitted encroachment, the permit for the encroachment shall be modified or revoked accordingly.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter an individual’s right to compensation that may otherwise exist at law or any rights an individual has under the Constitution of the state or the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

Notice and service required by this article shall be provided to the person or public agency believed to be responsible for the violation and the owner of the property on which the violation occurred or is threatened to occur by one of the following means:

(a) Hand delivery.

(b) Certified mail.

(c) If the person or agency cannot be reached or reasonably notified pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), by placing a copy of the notice or order on the encroachment or property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

(a) Civil penalties may be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction against any person or public agency that undertakes an activity, flood system improvement, or encroachment that is in violation of this part or that is inconsistent with any permit, cease and desist order, or enforcement order previously issued by the board or executive officer in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not greater than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(b) In addition to any other penalties, civil penalties may be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction against any person or public agency that intentionally and knowingly undertakes an activity, flood system improvement, or encroachment that is
 in violation of this part or that is inconsistent with any permit, cease and desist order, or enforcement order previously issued by the board or executive officer in an amount that shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day for each day in which the violation persists.

(c) In determining the amount of liability pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), the following factors shall be considered:

(1) The nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation.

(2) Whether the violation is susceptible to removal, modification, abatement, restoration, or other remedial measures.

(3) Whether the function of the levee, channel, or other flood control work is affected by the violation.

(4) The cost to the state of bringing the action.

(5) With respect to the person or public agency responsible for the violation, any voluntary remedial measures undertaken, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic profits, if any, resulting from, or expected to result as a consequence of, the violation, and other matters deemed relevant.

(d) Civil penalties may be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction against any person or public agency that intentionally or negligently violates any cease and desist order issued, reissued, or amended by the board, or any enforcement order issued, reissued, or amended by the board in an amount that shall not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each day in which that violation persists. Any actual penalty imposed shall be reasonably proportionate to
 the damage suffered as a consequence of the violation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.1.

(a) Administrative penalties may be imposed by the board in the same manner as civil penalties described in Section 8704, upon an enforcement hearing and issuance of an enforcement order pursuant to Section 8701.4, but shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) or exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a single violation.

(b) In imposing penalties, the board shall express its rationale for the amount and specifically address the factors listed under subdivision (c) of Section 8704.

(c) Any penalties imposed shall be paid within 60 days.

(d) A person or public
 agency shall not be subject to both civil and administrative penalties for the same violation.

(e) After the time for judicial review pursuant to Section 8579 has passed, the board may apply to the clerk of the appropriate court in the county in which the administrative penalties were imposed for a judgment to collect the penalties assessed. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the board action, constitutes a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment. The clerk shall enter judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.2.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 8701.4, the board or the board’s designee shall have the authority to record a lien with the county recorder in the county of this state where the person’s or agency’s property responsible for the violation is located, to recover any and all of the following:

(1) Costs incurred in abating, removing, and restoring a violation, including, but not limited to, costs incurred in seeking modification, removal, abatement, or restoration pursuant to this part.

(2) Costs incurred in the summary abatement of emergencies.

(3) Attorney’s fees associated with
 actions to enforce this part.

(b) A lien recorded pursuant to this section shall have the same force, effect, and priority as a judgment lien.

(c) Before recording a lien, the board shall provide notice and an opportunity for a hearing to contest the amount of the lien.

(1) Notice shall be provided at least 20 days before the hearing pursuant to Section 8703.

(2) The hearing required by this section may be satisfied by an enforcement order hearing pursuant to Section 8701.4 or, in the summary abatement of emergencies, a hearing pursuant to Section 8708.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 489, Sec. 2.   (SB 1345)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.4.

The remedies provided by this article are not exclusive of, but shall be concurrent with and in addition to, any other remedy, penalty, or sanction that may exist by law, civil or criminal. The board may enforce compliance with the provisions of this article by mandamus, mandatory injunction, or by any other appropriate remedy authorized by law. The action or proceeding may be commenced and maintained by the board in the name of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

The Flood Risk Management Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. All funds received from fees pursuant to Section 8535 and from penalties pursuant to this article shall be paid into the fund. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in the fund shall be expended by the board to carry out enforcement pursuant to this part, including the costs of the modification, removal, abatement, or restoration of violations and related litigation, or to carry out any type of service for which it charges fees pursuant to Section 8535.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 68.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

The board may maintain actions in the name of the state to compel by injunction the owner or owners of any bridge, trestle, wire line, viaduct, embankment, or other structure or obstruction that shall be intersected, traversed, or crossed by any bypass, drainage canal, channel, or overflow channel to construct or alter any structure in order to offer a minimum of obstruction to the free flow of water. In the case of existing works, the board may compel the removal or alteration of structures or obstructions that impede the free flow of water.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.5.

Any activity that does or may interfere with, obstruct the performance, maintenance, or operation of, or otherwise adversely affect facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control, designated floodways, or streams that are regulated by the board constitutes a public nuisance, and the board may commence and maintain a suit in the name of the people of the state for the prevention or abatement of that nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

If the board or Attorney General prevails in a civil action to enforce this part, or if a local agency prevails in a civil action to seek abatement costs under subdivision (c) of Section 8708 or modification, removal, abatement, or restoration costs as the board’s designee under subdivision (f) of Section 8701.4, the board, Attorney General, or local agency shall be awarded attorney’s fees and costs, including, but not limited to, any fees and costs incurred by its agents.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8708.

(a) Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the department, the board, the executive officer, or a levee-maintaining agency from taking any action to prevent an imminent failure of a levee, channel, floodway, stream bank, or flood control feature, or other emergency action necessary to protect the public welfare.

(b) To the extent emergency action is required that involves the removal, modification, or abatement of an encroachment, flood system improvement, or activity maintained by an individual or public agency, the individual or public agency may request a hearing before the board within 30 days after the action has been commenced.

(c) After a public hearing, by request or by its own motion, the entity that has carried out the abatement functions pursuant to this section may seek reimbursement of its abatement costs and may pursue any legal remedies available to recover its costs, including imposing a lien pursuant to Section 8704.2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8709.

The board shall adopt emergency regulations necessary to implement this article in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency that calls for the immediate action to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Approval of Plans [8710. - 8723.]

8710.

Every plan of reclamation, flood control, drainage, improvement, dredging or work, that includes or contemplates the construction, enlargement, revetment or alteration of any levee, embankment, canal or other excavation in the bed of or along or near the banks of the Sacramento or San Joaquin Rivers or any of their tributaries or connected therewith, or upon any land adjacent thereto, or within any of the overflow basins thereof, or upon any land susceptible to overflow therefrom, shall be approved by the board before construction is commenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 233.)
-------------------------------------------

8710.1.

The provisions of Section 8710 shall not apply to any work of interior irrigation or drainage upon reclaimed land, which work is not actually on, through, or adjoining any flood control works under the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1707.)
-------------------------------------------

8710.5.

Whenever any irrigation, drainage, levee, or flood control district makes application for the approval required by the next preceding section, all of the provisions of Division 15, Part 6, Chapter 2 of the Water Code which relate to works of reclamation by reclamation districts within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District shall be applicable to the works of such irrigation, drainage, levee, or flood control district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

8711.

Any such plan is void until approved by the board, and no work shall be done without the permission of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

No levee along a river or by-pass at any of the places mentioned in this article, nor any levee forming part of any of the plans of flood control adopted by this part or by the board, shall be cut or altered without permission of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8713.

The owner of any existing levee at any of the places mentioned in this article may raise, widen, or strengthen the levee, if before work is commenced, the plans, specifications and method of construction are submitted to and approved by the board, and the work is done subject to the supervision of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8714.

No claim shall ever be made against the board or the drainage district for compensation, through or by assessment or otherwise, for any part of the work under Section 8713 in excess of the requirements of the plan of flood control for that locality finally adopted and approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.

Any existing levee may be protected or strengthened in case of emergency during the season of flood water, where it is in danger of injury or destruction from flood water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8716.

Notice of emergency work shall be immediately given to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8717.

All emergency work shall be subject to the subsequent approval of the board, and the board may require its removal or alteration if not approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8718.

No levee, embankment or other structure within any by-pass or overflow channel adopted by the board shall be raised, widened, strengthened or altered without permission of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8719.

The doing of any act or construction of any work mentioned in this article, or permitting the work to remain after such construction, without the permission of the board and in violation of any of the provisions of this article, is a public nuisance, and the board may commence and maintain suit in the name of the people of the State for the prevention or abatement of the nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.

Any person who does any act contrary to or in violation of any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8721.

Any plans or specifications adopted or approved by the board for any work to be done pursuant to this part may be changed or altered, with the consent of the board, at any time before commencement or during progress of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8722.

The board may at any time change or alter the plans or specifications for work undertaken upon its own initiative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8723.

The board may refuse to approve any such plan if in the judgment of the board the plan will or may

1. Be injurious to or damage any works necessary to any plan of flood control adopted by the board or the Legislature, or

2. Interfere with the successful execution, functioning or operation of any plan of flood control adopted by the board or the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Hearings, Depositions and Notices [8730. - 8742.]

8730.

Any hearing before the board may be conducted upon sworn testimony of the applicants or witnesses except in the case of reports or investigations made by the members, employees or special advisers of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8730.1.

The board shall acknowledge the receipt of all applications in writing within 10 days of receipt. All applications shall be acted upon within 90 days of receipt, except that applications subject to the provisions of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall be acted upon within 180 days of receipt. Applicants may waive the requirement that applications be acted upon within such period.

This section shall not apply to emergency permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

8730.2.

Applicants shall be informed of the staff recommendations concerning the application at least seven days prior to being acted upon.

This section shall not apply to emergency permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

8730.3.

Applicants shall identify the names and addresses of contiguous landowners. Contiguous landowners so identified shall be informed of pending applications and their content and shall be informed of the staff recommendations concerning the application.

This section shall not apply to emergency permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

8731.

The board may meet at any place in the State for a hearing or partial hearing of any application coming before it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.

The board may hold a hearing or partial hearing before a committee of one or more members of the board, before a qualified neutral hearing officer designated by the board president, or before the executive officer or chief engineer of the board, at any place within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 4.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.5.

All hearings or partial hearings shall be open and public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8733.

The hearing officer shall take and report the evidence to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8734.

The board may require the applicant to pay all or part of the expenses of any outside hearing, if held at the request of the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8735.

The expenses shall include traveling expenses of the members, officers or employees of the board, expenses of stenographic reporting and transcribing evidence taken at the hearing, and a proportionate allowance, according to their usual rate of compensation, for the time of the members, officers and employees of the board required for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8736.

All money collected as compensation for the time of the members, officers or employees of the board shall be paid by the board into the State Treasury and credited to the balance remaining unexpended of any appropriation or assessment available for the general administrative expenses of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8737.

The board may provide for the taking at any place of the deposition under oath of any witness for or against any application pending before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8738.

The deposition shall be taken before a notary public or other officer or person authorized by law or by this part to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8739.

The deposition shall be certified and returned to the office of the board in the manner provided by law for certifying and returning depositions in civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.

When taken and certified pursuant to this article the deposition may be read in evidence before the board at the hearing of the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8741.

An affidavit may be used to prove the service or publication of any notice required or provided for by any of the provisions of this part in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for in Sections 2009 to 2015, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure, and the affidavit shall be received as prima facie evidence of the service or publication in any court or elsewhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8742.

In addition to the notices required by this part, the board may in its discretion give such notice as it may deem proper, by publication, mailing or otherwise, of any of its assessments, orders, proceedings, hearings or other acts done or contemplated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Assessments [8750. - 8864.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [8750. - 8774.]

8750.

Whenever in the opinion of the board it is necessary to levy an assessment upon any lands within the drainage district for any of the purposes specified in this chapter, the board shall adopt plans and make careful estimates of the costs and expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.

The estimate shall include the following:

(a) The expenses of bonding the assessment if authorized by law, other than an assessment to pay the costs and expenses necessary for the maintenance, repair, and operation of its existing works of reclamation and flood control.

(b) The costs and expenses necessary for the completion, maintenance, and operation of any project adopted by the board prior to April 1, 1923.

(c) The costs and expenses necessary for the adoption and carrying to completion of any project or work involved in or contained in the report of the California Debris Commission dated January 5, 1925.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8752.

The plans to be carried out shall be divided by the board into separate projects or units in such manner as will in its judgment best facilitate the levying of assessments for each particular project or unit in a just and equitable manner, according to benefits upon the lands in the district affected by the project or unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8753.

Each separate and particular project or unit shall include all by-passes, cuts, canals, sumps, levees, pumping plants and other works of flood control and drainage necessary to properly conduct the water of any stream, natural or otherwise, the outlet of which has been intercepted by the construction of any levee or embankment included in the project or unit into a by-pass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

The board shall enter in the minutes of the board a resolution to the effect that the execution of each separate project or unit which they determine upon is a public necessity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

Each project or unit shall be designated by the board in the resolution by name and number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8756.

All assessments, plans and funds intended for or connected with the execution of each project or unit shall be designated by name and number and kept separate and used only for the purpose of carrying out the particular project or unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8757.

In determining the benefits that will or may accrue to each particular tract of land by the construction or maintenance of the works contemplated by any project or unit, the works of the project or unit shall be considered as a whole and land shall be assessed for the works embraced in the project or unit only in the proportion that it will or may be benefited by the construction of the entire works embraced in the project or unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8758.

No land shall be considered as benefited by the construction or maintenance of the works embraced in a project or unit, nor shall any land be assessed for the expense of the construction or maintenance of the project or unit, because the land has been or may be first endangered or flooded, or the natural drainage thereof obstructed by the construction or maintenance of any part or portion of the works embraced in the project or unit prior to the completion of the construction of the entire works embraced in the project or unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8759.

Whenever an assessment has been levied by the board upon land in the district for general administrative expenses and other expenses not pertaining to any particular project, and the boundaries of the district have been or shall be extended so as to include land other than the land included within the district at the time the assessment was levied, the board shall make an estimate of the fair and equitable amount which should be contributed by the land included by the change of boundaries for the purposes of the assessment previously levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8760.

The board shall levy and cause to be assessed, equalized and collected in the manner provided in this part, an assessment to the amount of the estimate upon land included in the district by the change of boundaries, according to benefits in the manner provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8761.

Whenever in the opinion of the board it appears that the total amount of any assessment previously levied and assessed and which has become a lien upon land in the drainage district, including assessments which have been bonded pursuant to the provisions of Part 5 of this division, is greater than required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment was levied, the board may by resolution entered in its minutes, order the release of the lien of and abandonment of any part of the charges against any tract so assessed not required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8762.

The portions of the assessment to be first abandoned and released shall be such portions of the charges on each tract as are based upon flood control benefits or by-pass severance as those terms are defined in, and determined by the assessors appointed by the reclamation board, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8763.

No assessment upon any tract shall be released or abandoned in pursuance to Section 8761 until all delinquent installments which have accrued thereon, together with interest and penalties, have been paid in full and a copy of the resolution certified by the secretary of the board and attested with its seal has been deposited in the office of the county treasurer of each county wherein any land affected by the assessment is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8764.

The resolution shall be annexed by the county treasurer to the assessment list of the assessment for his county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8765.

When any payment has been made upon an assessment so abandoned and released, in whole or in part, the board may issue such warrants in the manner provided in this part as are necessary to secure a just, fair and equitable readjustment of the assessment so paid, but the reclamation board shall not take any action after June 30, 1944, to cause warrants to be issued for such readjustment of Sutter-Butte By-pass Assessment No. 6 and any action or proceeding brought to secure such readjustment of said Sutter-Butte By-pass Assessment No. 6 or to require the issuance of any warrant or payment of any money in connection with such readjustment of Sutter-Butte By-pass Assessment No. 6 must be commenced before January 1, 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8766.

The board may in its discretion abandon any assessment in whole or in part at any time prior to the time when the lien of the assessment has accrued to the extent that the assessment is greater than required to meet the obligations incurred or to be incurred thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8767.

In all cases in which an assessment is levied upon land within the drainage district, and the assessment upon any tract is thereafter adjudged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, or, for any reason, the tract is not legally charged with the assessment, the tract shall be charged in any subsequent assessment with such proportion of the former assessment as the benefits derived by the land from the purposes for which the former assessment was levied bears to the whole amount of the former assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8768.
